Tennessee, session 114, HB2543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-216(a), is amended by deleting
"commissioner of finance and administration" and substituting instead "director of the
Tennessee emergency management agency".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-216, is amended by deleting
subsections (c) and (d) and substituting:
(c)
(1) The governor's response and recovery fund may be used to provide
monies to eligible local governmental entities and to eligible individuals in
qualifying counties following an emergency or disaster, subject to subsection (d).
(2) As used in this section:
(A) "Eligible individual in a qualifying county" means an individual
who resides in a county where the county government or metropolitan
government has declared a state of emergency and who demonstrates:
(i) Tennessee residency and lawful presence in the United
States, as determined by the Tennessee emergency management
agency's procedures; and
(ii) Proof of loss or need, as determined by the Tennessee
emergency management agency's procedures; and
HB2543
011709
- 1 -

(B) "Eligible local governmental entity" means a county, a city, a
municipality, a metropolitan government, or a local education agency.
(d)
(1) Monies from this fund may be made available as a grant or a loan to
an eligible local governmental entity only if the following conditions are met:
(A) The governor has declared a state of emergency or issued a
disaster declaration, pursuant to § 58-2-107(b)(1)(A);
(B) The local jurisdiction where the eligible local governmental
entity is located has declared a state of emergency;
(C) Federal assistance under the Stafford Act, 42 U.S.C. Section
5121 et seq., is unavailable or does not adequately meet the needs of the
eligible local governmental entity;
(D) Eligible costs, as determined by the Tennessee emergency
management agency, sustained within a county exceed the most recent
countywide per capita impact indicator published by the Tennessee
emergency management agency on its website; and
(E) The chief elected official of the local jurisdiction where the
eligible local governmental entity is located submits a written request to
the director of the Tennessee emergency management agency for the
monies and shows that the other requirements under this subdivision
(d)(1) are satisfied.
(2) Monies from this fund may be used to provide individual assistance to
an eligible individual in a qualifying county only if the following conditions are
met:
- 2 - 011709

(A) The governor has declared a state of emergency or issued a
disaster declaration, pursuant to § 58-2-107(b)(1)(A);
(B) State damage totals from the emergency or disaster are
unlikely to meet the federal emergency management agency threshold for
individual assistance through a major disaster declaration, as determined
by the director of the Tennessee emergency management agency or the
director's designee;
(C) Eligible costs, as determined by the Tennessee emergency
management agency, sustained within a county exceed an amount to be
determined by the Tennessee emergency management agency. Damage
to public property is not an eligible cost; and
(D) The chief elected official of the local jurisdiction submits a
written letter to the director of the Tennessee emergency management
agency requesting that aid to eligible individuals be made available and
shows that the requirements under this subdivision (d)(2) are satisfied.
(3) Monies from this fund may be expended to cover any portion of a loss
or need consistent with this section; provided, that such portion is not otherwise
eligible for coverage through an insurance provider or another federal, state, or
local government entity; and provided, that assistance has not already been
provided for such portion from any source.
(4) An eligible local governmental entity receiving monies under
subdivision (d)(1) shall use procurement methods authorized under 2 CFR Part
200.
(5) Monies received by an eligible local governmental entity under
subdivision (d)(1) may only be used on the following types of projects:
- 3 - 011709

(A) The removal of debris, which includes clearing, removing, and
disposing of debris. Debris may include damaged automobiles and
aquatic vessels, as well as vegetative debris, construction and demolition
debris, sand, dirt, gravel, pebbles, and boulders;
(B) The use of emergency protective measures to eliminate or
reduce immediate threats to life, public health, or safety;
(C) The elimination or reduction of immediate threats of
significant additional damage to improved public or private property;
(D) The repair or replacement of roads, bridges, and other
transportation infrastructure;
(E) The repair or replacement of buildings, including structural
and nonstructural components such as mechanical, electrical, and
plumbing systems;
(F) The repair or replacement of equipment, including vehicles
and construction machinery; and
(G) The repair or replacement of public utilities, including water
storage facilities, sewage collection, and power and communication
systems.
(6) Projects described in subdivision (d)(5) must be completed within
eighteen (18) months of the date the Tennessee emergency management
agency awarded the monies, unless an extension has been granted by the
agency. Otherwise, costs incurred after eighteen (18) months are not eligible for
reimbursement.
(7) If monies are made available in the form of a grant for projects
described in subdivision (d)(5), then such grant must have a local cost share that
- 4 - 011709

corresponds with the department of economic and community development's
index of county economic status. The portion of the cost for which the eligible
local governmental entity is responsible must be determined by the county's
economic status on the date the emergency or disaster began, as follows:
(A) Attainment – fifty percent (50%);
(B) Competitive – forty percent (40%);
(C) Transitional – thirty percent (30%);
(D) At-Risk – twenty percent (20%); and
(E) Distressed – twelve and one-half percent (12.5%).
(8) Subdivision (d)(7) does not prohibit the governor from waiving all or
part of the required local cost share.
(9) Loan repayments must become part of the fund and remain available
for the purposes described in this section.
(10) Monies from this fund may not be used to cover any portion of an
insurance deductible.
(11) Within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of approval for
monies under subdivision (d)(1), an eligible local governmental entity is required
to have full coverage for all-risk property insurance and for flood insurance. The
director of the Tennessee emergency management agency may extend this
deadline upon a showing of reasonable need.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect on July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 011709